Tennessee statutes. Title 37 Juveniles
Part 5

Child Care Agencies

37-5-501. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires, “child care agency” includes “child abuse agency,” “child caring institution,” “child placing agency,” “detention center,” “family boarding home or foster home,” “group care home,” “maternity home,” or “temporary holding resource” as defined in subsection (b).

As used in this part, unless otherwise excluded pursuant to § 37-5-503, and unless the context otherwise requires:

“Care giver,” “care givers,” “care provider,” or “care providers” mean the person or persons or entity or entities responsible for providing for the supervision, protection and basic needs of the child;

“Child” or “children” means a person or persons under eighteen (18) years of age;

“Child abuse agency” means and includes any place, facility or service operated by any entity or person, that undertakes to or does provide any services of any nature whatsoever, including, but not limited to, emergency shelter care, homemaker services, or parent training services, designed to prevent or treat child abuse or neglect or to protect children from child abuse or neglect. “Child abuse agency” does not include any entity or a person licensed by the state to practice medicine or psychology while in the course of such practice; nor any school, hospital, mental health center, or similar institution operated or approved by any agency or department of the state; nor any church or church-related organization;

Nothing in subdivision (b)(3)(A) shall be construed, however, to diminish or repeal the duty of any person to report suspected child abuse pursuant to chapter 1, parts 4 and 6 of this title; and

The provisions of this subdivision (b)(3) do not constitute an appropriation of funds, and, commencing with the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2000, no funds shall be expended under the provisions of this subdivision (b)(3) unless such funds are specifically appropriated in the general appropriations act pursuant to §§ 9-4-5101 — 9-4-5114, or a specific amendment or supplement thereto;

“Child care” means the provision of supervision, protection and the basic needs of a child for twenty-four (24) hours a day including the provision of such temporary services to a child awaiting placement in permanent care. Care for a child of less than twenty-four (24) hours duration is licensed by the department of human services pursuant to title 71, chapter 3, part 5;

“Child care agency” or “agency” means the person or entity that provides child care, regardless of whether such person or entity is licensed;

“Child caring institution” means any place or facility operated by any entity or person providing residential child care for thirteen (13) or more children who are not related to the primary care givers;

“Child placing agency” means any entity or person that places children in foster boarding homes or foster homes for temporary care or for adoption or any other entity or person or group of persons who are engaged in providing adoption studies or foster care studies or placement services as defined by the rules of the department;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of children's services;

“Department” means the department of children's services;

“Detention center” means a place or facility operated by any entity or person, governmental or otherwise, for the confinement in a hardware secure facility of a child or children who meet the criteria of § 37-1-114(c) or other applicable laws and who:

Are in need of legal temporary placement;

Are awaiting adjudication of a pending petition; or

Are awaiting disposition or placement;

“Family boarding home or foster home” means a home (occupied residence) operated by any entity or person that provides residential child care to at least one (1) child but not more than six (6) children who are not related to the primary care givers;

“Foster child or children” means the person or persons who are living in a child care or residential child care facility as a result of the removal by a court of custody from the child's parent or parents to the department, by a surrender of parental or guardian rights executed by the child's parent or parents or guardian, or as the result of the execution of any legal document transferring legal custody from the parent or parents or guardian of the child to the department, or to the entity or person operating a child care agency;

“Group care home” means any place or facility operated by any entity or person that provides residential child care for at least seven (7) children but not more than twelve (12) children who are not related to the primary care givers;

“Maternity home” means any place or facility operated by any entity or person that receives, treats or cares for more than one (1) child or adult who is pregnant out of wedlock, either before, during or within two (2) weeks after childbirth; provided, that the licensed child placing agencies and licensed maternity homes may use a family boarding home approved and supervised by the agency or home, as a part of their work, for as many as three (3) children or adults who are pregnant out of wedlock; and provided further, that “maternity home” does not include children or women who receive maternity care in the home of a person to whom they are kin within the sixth degree of kindred computed according to civil law, nor does it apply to any maternity care provided by general or special hospitals licensed according to law and in which maternity treatment and care is part of the medical services performed and the care of children is brief and incidental;

“Related” means, for purposes of “child care,” the children, step-children, grandchildren, step-grandchildren, siblings of the whole or half-blood, step-siblings, nieces, nephews or foster children of the primary care giver. For purposes of “residential child care,” “related” means children, step-children, grandchildren, step-grandchildren, siblings of the whole or half-blood, step-siblings, nieces or nephews of the primary care provider;

“Residential child care” means the provision of supervision or protection, and meeting the basic needs of a child for twenty-four (24) hours per day; and

“Temporary holding resource” means a place or facility housing primarily no more than eight (8) children operated by any entity or person, governmental or otherwise, providing a short-term (less than seventy-two (72) hours, exclusive of non-judicial days) placement alternative for a child or children in a primarily staff-secure facility, as defined by the department, while the child or children await adjudication of a pending petition or disposition following adjudication, or pending return to a dispositional placement. This facility shall have a maximum of two (2) hardware secure rooms. At least one half (½) of the rooms in the facility shall be non-hardware secure.

Acts 2000, ch. 981, § 19.

37-5-502. Basis for licensing — Regulations — License application — Temporary license — Non-transferability of license — Transfer of operation to circumvent licensing laws or regulations — Fees.

Any person or entity operating a child abuse agency, child caring institution, child placing agency, detention center, family boarding home or foster home, group care home, maternity home, or temporary holding resource, as defined in § 37-5-501, must be licensed by the department as provided by this part.

The department has the authority to issue regulations pursuant to the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, part 2, for the licensing of any persons or entities subject to any provisions of this part and the enforcement of appropriate standards for the health, safety and welfare of children under the care or supervision of those entities.

To the extent they are not inconsistent with the statutory provisions of this part, the regulations of the department that are in effect on July 1, 2000, shall remain in force and effect until modified by regulatory action of the department.

The department's regulations of child care agencies shall be developed, and the continued approval of the licensing of a child care agency, shall be based upon the following criteria:

The safety, welfare and best interests of the children in the care of the agency;

The capability, training and character of the persons providing or supervising the care to the children;

The quality of the methods of care and instruction provided for the children;

The suitability of the facilities provided for the care of the children;

The adequacy of the methods of administration and the management of the child care agency, the agency's personnel policies, and the financing of the agency; and

The present need for the child care agency.

The department shall provide reasonable assistance to applicants or licensees in meeting the child care standards of the department, unless the circumstances demonstrate that further assistance is not compatible with the continued safety, health or welfare of the children in the agency's care, and that regulatory action affecting the agency's license is warranted. All costs and expenses arising from or related to meeting the child care standards of the department shall be borne entirely by the applicant or licensee.

If a licensee is denied the renewal of a license, or if a license is revoked, or if any applicant for a license cannot meet the standards, then the department shall assist in planning for the placement of such children in licensed child care agencies, or other suitable care, return them to their own homes or make any other plans as seem necessary and advisable to meet the particular needs of the children involved.

Application for a license to operate a child care agency shall be made in writing to the department in such manner as the department determines and shall be accompanied by the appropriate fee set forth in the fee schedule in subsection (f).

If the department determines that the applicant for a license that is not the renewal of an existing license, has presented satisfactory evidence that the facility that is proposed for the care of children has received fire safety and environmental safety approval, that the applicant and the personnel who will care for the children are capable in all substantial respects to care for the children and that the applicant has the ability and intent to comply with the licensing law and regulations, the department shall issue a temporary license to the applicant; provided, that no temporary license shall be issued for child care agencies that federal law or regulations do not permit the department to license until all necessary licensing requirements are met.

If the department determines that the conditions of the applicant's facility, its methods of care or other circumstances warrant, it may issue a restricted license that limits the agency's authority in one (1) or more areas of operation.

The purpose of the temporary license is to permit the license applicant to demonstrate to the department that it has complied with all licensing laws and regulations applicable to its classification prior to the issuance of an initial annual license.

Within ninety (90) days of the issuance of the temporary license, the department shall determine if the applicant has complied with all regulations governing the classification of child care agency for which the application was made.

If the department determines that the applicant has complied with all licensing regulations for the classification of child care agency for which application was made, the department shall issue an annual license.

If the department determines that the conditions of the applicant's facility, its methods of care or other circumstances warrant, it may issue a restricted license that limits the agency's authority in one (1) or more areas of operation.

In granting any license, the department may limit the total number of children who may be enrolled in the agency regardless of whether the agency may have the physical capacity to care for more children.

The licensee shall post the license in a clearly visible location as determined by the department so that persons visiting the agency can readily view the license.

If the department fails to issue or deny an annual license within ninety (90) days of the granting of the temporary license, the temporary license shall remain in effect, unless suspended, as provided in § 37-5-514 until such determination is made. If an annual license is denied following the issuance of a temporary license, and if a timely appeal is made of the denial of the annual license, the temporary license shall remain in effect, unless suspended, until the board of review renders a decision regarding the denial of the annual license.

If a temporary or annual license is denied, or an annual license is restricted, the applicant may appeal the denial or restriction as provided in § 37-5-514.

Except as provided herein, no license for a child care agency shall be transferable, and the transfer by sale or lease, or in any other manner, of the operation of the agency to any other person or entity shall void the existing license immediately and any pending appeal involving the status of the license, and the agency shall be required to close immediately. If the transferee has made application for, and is granted, a temporary license, the agency may continue operation under the direction of the new licensee. The new licensee in such circumstances may not be the transferor or any person or entity acting on behalf of the transferor.

If the department determines that any person or entity has transferred nominal control of an agency to any persons or entities who are determined by the department to be acting on behalf of the purported transferor in order to circumvent a history of violations of the licensing law or regulations or to otherwise attempt to circumvent the licensing law or regulations or any prior licensing actions instituted by the department, the department may deny the issuance of any license to the applicant. The denial of the license may be appealed as provided in § 37-5-514.

The license of any agency shall not be voided nor shall any pending appeal be voided pursuant to this subsection (e) solely for the reason that the agency is subject to judicial orders directing the transfer of control or management of a child care agency or its license to any receiver, trustee, administrator or executor of an estate, or any similarly situated person or entity.

If the current licensee dies, and provided that no licensing violations require the suspension, denial or revocation of the agency's license, the department may grant family members of the licensee, or administrators or executors of the licensee, a temporary license to continue operation for a period of ninety (90) days. At the end of such period, the department shall determine whether an annual or extended license should be granted to a new licensee as otherwise provided in this section.

Nothing in this subsection (e) shall be construed to prevent the department from taking any regulatory or judicial action as may be required pursuant to the licensing laws and regulations that may be necessary to protect the children in the care of such agency.

The following fees shall apply to applications for licenses for child care agencies licensed pursuant to this part:

Family boarding home or foster care home $25.00

Group care home 25.00

Any child caring institution or child placing agency 25.00

Maternity home 25.00

Child abuse agency 25.00

Detention center 25.00

Temporary holding resources 25.00

All licensure application and renewal fees collected by the department pursuant to this part shall be paid into the general fund, but shall be earmarked for and dedicated to the department. Such earmarked fees shall be used by the department exclusively to improve child care quality in this state by funding activities that include, but are not limited to, child care provider training activities, but excluding any costs associated with conducting criminal background checks.

A license issued to a child placing agency by the department shall include all boarding homes, group care homes or foster homes approved, supervised and used by the licensed agency as a part of its work.

Notwithstanding any provisions of title 13, chapter 7, to the contrary, upon adoption of a resolution by a two thirds (2/3) vote of the county legislative body, any zoning authority, in determining the suitability of a request for any use of property for the establishment or alteration of any child care agency, may consider the criminal background of the person or persons making a request to such board or may consider the criminal background of any person or persons who will manage or operate such child care agency. The board may require the person to submit a fingerprint sample and a criminal history disclosure form and may submit the fingerprint sample for comparison by the Tennessee bureau of investigation pursuant to § 38-6-109, or it may conduct the background check by other means as it deems appropriate. The zoning authority shall be responsible for all costs associated with obtaining such criminal background information.

Acts 2000, ch. 981, § 20.

37-5-503. Program and facilities exempt from licensing.

The following entities, facilities or programs are excluded from licensing or approval as child care agencies pursuant to this part:

All child care regulated by the departments of education or human services;

Public or private summer day camps or overnight camps such as those operated by the Boy or Girl Scouts, the YMCA or YWCA, by church or religious organizations or by organizations representing disabled children that operate less than ninety (90) days per year and other similar businesses or programs as determined by the department;

Entities or persons licensed or otherwise regulated by other agencies of the state or federal governments providing health, psychiatric or psychological care or treatment or mental health care or counseling for children while the entity or person is engaged in such licensed or regulated activity;

Schools and educational programs and facilities, the primary purpose of which is to provide a regular course of study necessary for advancement to a higher educational level or completion of a prescribed course of study, and that may, incident to such educational purpose, provide boarding facilities to the students of such programs; provided, that boarding schools that provide services intended to correct or ameliorate behaviors of youth that prevent or inhibit their ability to function normally in their home, community, or school, or agencies serving children as an alternative to their remaining in a dysfunctional or harmful home environment, shall not be exempted from licensure as a child care agency under this part; and

Orphanages or other similarly designated homes affiliated with, funded, and operated by a church or religious organization, which homes receive their principal financial support from such church or religious affiliation in counties having a population of not less than twelve thousand three hundred (12,300) nor more than twelve thousand three hundred fifty (12,350), according to the 1970 federal census.

Acts 2000, ch. 981, § 21; 2003, ch. 355, § 26.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 355, § 66 provided that no expenditure of public funds pursuant to the act shall be made in violation of the provisions of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, as codified in 42 U.S.C. § 2000d.

For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

37-5-504. Preexisting agencies subject to chapter.

All child caring institutions, child placing agencies and maternity homes chartered in this state prior to July 1, 2000, shall be subject to all of its requirements.

Acts 2000, ch. 981, § 22.

37-5-505. Receiving children.

Child caring institutions, and child placing agencies, family boarding homes, group care homes or foster homes, when licensed in accordance with this part, may receive needy or dependent children from their parents or legal guardians for special, temporary or continued care. The parents or guardians may sign releases or agreements giving to such institutions or agencies custody and control of the persons of such children during the period of such care, which may be extended until the children arrive at legal age, or they may surrender such children to a licensed child placing agency for purposes of adoption, such surrender to be in conformity with the provisions of the law governing the surrender of children for adoption.

Acts 2000, ch. 981, § 23.

37-5-506. Selection and supervision of foster homes.

Child placing agencies, in placing children in private families, shall safeguard their welfare by a thorough investigation of each applicant and its home and its environment, carefully select the home in which the child is placed, and personally and adequately supervise each home and child until the child is legally adopted or released.

All children placed in private families shall be, as far as it is practicable, placed with those of the same religious faith as the children themselves, or their parents.

Acts 2000, ch. 981, § 24.

37-5-507. Unlicensed placement of children for care or adoption.

Private individuals, including midwives, physicians, nurses, hospital officials, lawyers and the officials of any nonchartered or nonlicensed child caring institution, child placing agency, or maternity home, are forbidden to engage in placing children for temporary care or for adoption.

A violation of this section is a Class A misdemeanor.

Acts 2000, ch. 981, § 25.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

37-5-508. Injunctions against unlicensed operations.

The department may, in accordance with the laws of the state of Tennessee governing injunctions, maintain an action in the name of the state of Tennessee to enjoin any person, partnership, association, corporation or other entity from establishing, conducting, managing or operating any place or facility providing services to children without having a license as required by law, or from continuing to operate any such place or facility following suspension of a license or following the effective date of the denial or revocation of a license.

In charging any defendant in a complaint for such injunction, it shall be sufficient to charge that such defendant did, upon a certain day and in a certain county, establish, conduct, manage or operate a place, home or facility of any kind that is a child care agency as defined in this part or to charge that the defendant is about to do so without having in effect a license as required by law, or that the defendant continues to operate any such place or facility following suspension of a license, or following the effective date of the denial or revocation of a license, without averring any further or more particular facts concerning the case. Refusal to obey the inspection order may be punished as contempt.

Acts 2000, ch. 981, § 26.

Cross-References. Contempt, title 29, ch. 9.

37-5-509. Criminal violations.

Any person or entity, as defined in § 37-5-501, operating a child care agency without being licensed by the department or who continues to operate while a suspension of the license is in effect, or who operates a child care agency following the effective date of a denial or revocation of a license, commits a Class A misdemeanor.

Each day of operation without an effective license constitutes a separate offense.

It is unlawful for any person who is an operator, licensee or employee of a child care agency to make any statement, whether written or verbal, knowing such statement is false, including, but not limited to, statements regarding:

The number of children in the child care agency;

The area of the child care agency used for child care; or

The credentials, licensure or qualification of any care giver, employee, substitute or volunteer of the child care agency, when such statement is made to a parent or guardian of a child in the care of such agency, to any state or local official having jurisdiction over such agencies, or to any law enforcement officer.

In order for subdivision (c)(1) to apply, the falsity of the statement must place at risk the health or safety of a child in the care of the child care agency.

A violation of subdivision (c)(1) is a Class A misdemeanor.

This subsection (c) includes statements made in any child care agency license application that misrepresents or conceals a material fact that would have resulted in the license's being denied.

In addition to any punishment authorized under this subsection (c), the department may also take any licensure action authorized under this part.

Acts 2000, ch. 981, § 27.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

37-5-510. Public agencies — Inspection and report.

Any child care agency, as defined in § 37-5-501, that is under the direct management of an administrative department of the state, a county, or a municipality, or any combination of these three (3), shall not be subject to licensure, but shall meet the minimum standards for programs and care as required of such child care agencies.

The commissioner, through the commissioner's authorized representative, shall make periodic inspections of such publicly administered child care agencies.

The report of such inspections and recommendations shall be made in writing to the executive head of the publicly administered child care agency, the board of directors, if any, and the division of the state, county or municipal government that has the duty under the law to operate such agency.

It is the duty of the department to cooperate with the publicly administered agencies herein referred to, to implement recommended changes in program and policies.

If, within a reasonable time, such standards and recommendations are not met, it shall be the duty of the commissioner to make public in the community in which this agency is located, the report of the above-mentioned inspection.

If violations of the standards for child care agencies are found and are not corrected within a reasonable time, or, if serious violations are found that meet the requirements that would justify the suspension of a child care agency's license pursuant to § 4-5-320, the department may file a complaint in the chancery court of the county in which the child care agency is located.

The chancery court shall have jurisdiction to hear the complaint and to enter any orders or injunctive relief necessary to ensure the correction of such violations or to suspend the operations of the facility for the protection of the children who are in the care of the child care agency.

Acts 2000, ch. 981, § 28.

37-5-511. Criminal violation information required of persons having access to children — Review of vulnerable persons registry — Verification — Exclusion from access to children.

Each person:

Applying to work with children as a paid employee with a child care agency as defined in § 37-5-501, or with the department in any position in which any significant contact with children is likely in the course of the person's employment; or

A new volunteer who is expected to provide volunteer services in excess of twenty (20) hours per month in a child care agency, or with the department, in any position in which any significant contact with children is likely in the course of the person's volunteer status, shall complete a criminal history disclosure form in a manner approved by the department, and shall agree to release all records involving the person relating criminal history of such person to the child care agency and to the department for the purpose of verifying the accuracy of criminal violation information contained on the disclosure form required by this section.

Such persons also shall submit to a criminal history records check to be conducted through the Tennessee bureau of investigation, shall supply fingerprint samples to the Tennessee bureau of investigation and to the federal bureau of investigation, and shall submit to a review of such person's status on the department of health's vulnerable persons registry under title 68, chapter 11, part 10;

The disclosure forms shall include at a minimum the following information:

The social security number of the applicant or volunteer;

The complete name of the applicant or volunteer;

Disclosure of information relative to any violations of the law, including pending criminal charges of any kind, and any conviction involving a sentence or suspended or reduced sentence and a release of all records involving the person's criminal background history; and

A space for the applicant or volunteer to state any circumstances that should be considered in determining whether to allow the person to be employed or to remain as a resident in the agency or to provide volunteer services.

The form shall notify the applicant or volunteer that falsification of required information may subject the person to criminal prosecution, and that the person's employment or volunteer status with the agency or the department is conditional pending a criminal records history review regarding the person's criminal history status.

A copy of the disclosure form shall be maintained in the child care agency's records for review by the department, and the department shall maintain a copy of the disclosure form in the records of the applicant for employment or volunteer services with the department.

The disclosure form shall be sent to the department by the child care agency and, pursuant to § 38-6-109, the department may directly access the computer files of the Tennessee bureau of investigation's Tennessee crime information center (T.C.I.C.) using only names or other identifying data elements contained in the disclosure form or such other information as may be available to the department to obtain available Tennessee criminal history background information for the purpose of criminal background reviews.

If information obtained by this method indicates that there exists or may exist a criminal record on the individual, the department shall further review the criminal record history with the individual and the entity with whom the individual is associated to obtain further verification, and the department shall request fingerprint samples from the individual and submit the fingerprints for a complete Tennessee and federal criminal history background review pursuant to § 38-6-109. The department shall pay the costs of such fingerprint background checks pursuant to §§ 38-6-103 and 38-6-109.

Pending the outcome of the background check, the applicant for employment or for a volunteer services position shall be conditional with the agency or with the department, and shall be dependent upon the outcome of the background check.

The results of the inquiry to the Tennessee bureau of investigation shall be recorded in the applicant's or volunteer's records.

If the information on the form appears to have been falsified, the Tennessee bureau of investigation shall report such finding to the department. The department shall notify, in writing, the appropriate district attorney general of such falsification.

The agency, and the department for its employees and volunteers, shall utilize the information on the form to conduct an inquiry of the department of health's vulnerable persons registry pursuant to title 68, chapter 11, part 10, for a review of the person's status on such registry. The results of the inquiry to the registry shall be maintained in the applicant's or volunteer's records.

Whether obtained by use of the procedures established in this section or whether such information is obtained by any other means, conviction of an offense, or a lesser included offense, or a finding in a juvenile proceeding, involving the physical, sexual or emotional abuse or gross neglect of a child or that constitutes conviction of an offense, or a finding in a juvenile proceeding, involving violence against a child, or any person, or conviction of an offense determined by the department, pursuant to properly promulgated rules, to present a threat to the health, safety or welfare of children, and any pending warrants, indictments or presentments, or pending juvenile proceedings, for such offenses or acts as a juvenile, as determined by rules of the department, or the identification of the individual on the department of health's vulnerable persons registry pursuant to title 68, chapter 11, part 10, shall disqualify the individual from employment with, as a licensee of a child care agency or from providing any volunteer services to children in, or from having any access whatsoever to children as a resident of, a child care agency as defined by this part, or with the department; provided, that the exclusionary provisions of this section shall not apply to children in the care, custody or control of the department.

No person who is currently charged with or who has been convicted of or pled guilty to a violation of § 39-13-213, § 55-10-101, § 55-10-102 or § 55-10-401, or any felony involving use of a motor vehicle while under the influence of any intoxicant, may, for a period of five (5) years after the date of such conviction or felony plea, be employed as or serve as a driver transporting children for a child care agency.

The child care agency, and the department for its employees, shall immediately exclude an individual from employment or volunteer services with children, if the results of the criminal background check or review of the vulnerable person's registry demonstrate to the agency, or upon review by the department demonstrate, that the criminal history of such individual is within the prohibited categories established in subdivision (d)(1). If an exemption from the exclusion is provided for by rule of the department pursuant to subsection (e), such person shall remain excluded until it is determined by the department whether there is a basis for an exception from the exclusion.

The failure of a child care agency to exclude a person with a prohibited criminal history from employment with, or from the provision of volunteer services, or the failure, as determined by the department, to adequately restrict the access to children of a resident at a child care agency, shall subject the child care agency to immediate suspension of the agency's license by the department.

Any person who is excluded based upon the results of the criminal history background review may appeal the exclusion to the department within ten (10) days of the mailing date of the notice of such exclusion to the subject person.

If timely appealed, the department shall provide an administrative hearing pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, part 3, in which the appellant may challenge the accuracy of the report, and may challenge the failure to grant an exception to the exclusion required by this subsection (d) if a rule for such purpose is promulgated by the department pursuant to subsection (e).

The appellant may not collaterally attack the factual basis of an underlying conviction, except to show that the applicant is not the person identified on the record. Further, except to show that the applicant is not the person identified on the record, the appellant may not collaterally attack or litigate the facts that are the basis of a reported pending criminal charge, except to show that such charge was, or, since the report was generated, has been, dismissed, nolled or has resulted in an acquittal.

The department may by rule promulgate standards of review for the purpose of considering exemptions from the criminal background exclusion established by this section.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the exclusion of any individual from providing care for, from being licensed, approved or certified for the care of children pursuant to this part or from having access to a child in a child caring situation if the discovery of a criminal or juvenile proceeding background is discovered and verified in any manner other than through a procedure established pursuant to this section. All procedures, rules, and appeal processes established pursuant to this section for the protection of children and the due process rights of excluded individuals shall also be applicable to such individuals.

It is unlawful for any person to falsify any information required on the disclosure form required by this section. A person who knowingly fails to disclose on the disclosure form required information or who knowingly discloses false information or who knowingly assists another to do so commits a Class A misdemeanor.

The provisions of this section shall apply to detention centers and temporary holding resources described in § 37-5-109.

Acts 2000, ch. 981, § 29; 2003, ch. 26, §§ 1, 2; 2006, ch. 808, § 2.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.